Missouri, session 2026, HB2732.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 67.319, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 67.319, to read as follows:
67.319. 1. If approved by a majority of the voters voting on the proposal, any city,
town, village, sewer district, or water supply district located within this state may, by
ordinance, levy and impose annually upon water service lines providing water service to
residential property having four or fewer dwelling units within the jurisdiction of such city,
town, village, sewer district, or water supply district a fee not to exceed [one dollar] two
dollars per month or [twelve] twenty-four dollars annually.
2. The ballot of submission shall be in substantially the following form:
For the purpose of repair or replacement of water lines extending from
the water main to a residential dwelling due to failure of the line, shall
______ (city, town, village, sewer district, or water supply district) be
authorized to impose a fee not to exceed [one dollar] two dollars per
month or [twelve] twenty-four dollars annually on residential property
for each water service line providing water service within the (city,
town, village, sewer district, or water supply district) to residential
property having four or fewer dwelling units for the purpose of paying
for the costs of necessary water service line repairs or replacements?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2732 2
3. For the purpose of this section, a water service line may be defined by local
ordinance, but may not include the water meter or exceed that portion of water piping and
related valves and connectors which extends from the water mains owned by the utility or
municipality distributing public water supply to the first opportunity for a connection or joint
beyond the point of entry into the premises receiving water service, and may not include
facilities owned by the utility or municipality distributing public water supply. For purposes
of this section, repair may be defined and limited by local ordinance, and may include
replacement or repairs.
4. If a majority of the voters voting thereon approve the proposal authorized in
subsection 1 of this section, the governing body of the city, town, village, sewer district, or
water supply district may enact an ordinance for the collection of such fee. The funds
collected under such ordinance shall be deposited in a special account to be used solely for the
purpose of paying for the reasonable costs associated with and necessary to administer and
carry out the water service line repairs as defined in the ordinance and to reimburse the
necessary costs of water service line repair or replacement. All interest generated on
deposited funds shall be accrued to the special account established for the repair of water
service lines.
5. The city, town, village, sewer district, or water supply district may establish, as
provided in the ordinance, regulations necessary for the administration of collections, claims,
repairs, replacements and all other activities necessary and convenient for the implementation
of any ordinance adopted and approved under this section. The city, town, village, sewer
district, or water supply district may administer the program or may contract with one or more
persons, through a competitive process, to provide for administration of any portion of
implementation activities of any ordinance adopted and approved under this section, and
reasonable costs of administering the program may be paid from the special account
established under this section.
6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the collector in any
city, town, village, sewer district, or water supply district or county that adopts an ordinance
under this section, who now or hereafter collects any fee to provide for, ensure or guarantee
the repair of water service lines, may add such fee to the general tax levy bills of property
owners within the city, town, village, sewer district, or water supply district or unincorporated
area of the county. All revenues received on such combined bill which are for the purpose of
providing for, ensuring or guaranteeing the repair of water service lines shall be separated
from all other revenues so collected and credited to the appropriate fund or account of the
city, town, village, sewer district, or water supply district or county. The collector of the city,
town, village, sewer district, or water supply district or county may collect such fee in the

HB 2732 3
same manner and to the same extent as the collector now or hereafter may collect delinquent
real estate taxes and tax bills.
✔